Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1131
Licensed dental hygienist; procedures and functions authorized; enumerated.

When authorized by and under the general supervision of a licensed dentist, a licensed dental hygienist may perform the following intra and extra oral procedures and functions:

(1) Oral prophylaxis, periodontal scaling, and root planing which includes supragingival and subgingival debridement;

(2) Polish all exposed tooth surfaces, including restorations;

(3) Conduct and assess preliminary charting, probing, screening examinations, and indexing of dental and periodontal disease, with referral, when appropriate, for a dental diagnosis by a licensed dentist;

(4) Brush biopsies;

(5) Pulp vitality testing;

(6) Gingival curettage;

(7) Removal of sutures;

(8) Preventive measures, including the application of fluorides, sealants, and other recognized topical agents for the prevention of oral disease;

(9) Impressions for study casts;

(10) Application of topical and subgingival agents;

(11) Radiographic exposures;

(12) Oral health education, including conducting workshops and inservice training sessions on dental health;

(13) Application or administration of antimicrobial rinses, fluorides, and other anticariogenic agents;

(14) Upon completion of education and testing approved by the board, interim therapeutic restoration technique; and

(15) All of the duties that a dental assistant who is not licensed is authorized to perform.

Upon completion of education and testing approved by the board and when authorized by and under the general supervision of a licensed dentist, a licensed dental hygienist may write prescriptions for mouth rinses and fluoride products that help decrease the risk for tooth decay.

Laws 1986, LB 572, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 800, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.17;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 464;

Laws 2017, LB18, § 17.